Wyoming, session 2025, SF0154.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 18-5-506, 18-5-507(a) and
35-12-110(d) and (f)(intro) are amended to read:
18-5-506. Hearing and public comment.
Any board of county commissioners receiving an application
to permit a facility shall hold a public hearing to
consider public comment on the application no less than
forty-five (45) days and not more than sixty (60) ninety
(90) days after determining that the application is
complete. The applicant may agree to extend the date by
which a public hearing is held under this section. Written
comment on the application shall be accepted by the board
of county commissioners for not less than forty-five (45)
days after determining that the application is complete.
18-5-507. Decision of the board; findings necessary.
(a) Within forty-five (45) sixty (60) days from the
date of completion of the hearing required by W.S.
18-5-506, the board shall make complete findings, issue an
opinion, render a decision upon the record either granting
or denying the application and state whether or not the
applicant has met the standards required by this article.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0154
ENROLLED ACT NO. 46, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
The decision shall be subject to the remedies provided in
W.S. 18-5-508. The board shall grant a permit if it
determines that the proposed facility complies with all
standards properly adopted by the board of county
commissioners and the standards required by this article.
35-12-110. Service of notice of application;
information and recommendations; application deficiencies;
procedure; jurisdiction; hearing.
(d) On receipt of an application, the director shall
conduct a review of the application to determine if it
contains all the information required by W.S. 35-12-109 and
the rules and regulations. If the director determines that
the application is incomplete, he shall within thirty (30)
days of receipt of the application notify the applicant of
the specific deficiencies in the application. The applicant
shall provide the additional information necessary within
thirty (30) forty‑five (45) days of a receipt of a request
for additional information from the director.
(f) Not more than ninety (90) one hundred twenty
(120) days after receipt of an application for a permit,
the director shall:
Section 2. This act shall apply to all applications
for permits submitted under the Industrial Development
Information and Siting Act and under W.S. 18-5-501 through
18-5-513 on and after January 1, 2026.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0154
ENROLLED ACT NO. 46, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective January 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
3